dictsource/wo_rules
 
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Wolof (Senegal, Gambia)
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
        a        a
        aa       a:

.group b
        b         b
        bb        b:

.group c
        c        c
        cc       c:

.group d
        d        d
        dd       d:

.group e
        e        E
        ee       E:

.group é
        é        e
        ée       e:
        éé       e:

.group ë
        ë        @
        ëe       @:
        ëë       @:

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gg       g:

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
        ii       i:

.group j
        j        J
        j        J:

.group k
        k        k
        kk       k:

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m
        mm       m:
     K) m (K     m-

.group n
        n        n
        nn       n:
     K) n (K     n-

.group ŋ
        ŋ        N
        ŋŋ       N:
     K) ŋ (K     N-

.group ñ
        ñ        n^

.group o
        o        O
        oo       O:

.group ó
        ó        o
        óo       o:
        óó       o:

.group p
        p        p
        pp       p:

.group q
        q        q
        qq       q:

.group r
        r        R2
        r (r     R

.group s
        s        s
        ss       ss2

.group t
        t        t
        tt       t:

.group u
        u        u
        uu       u:

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        x

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z


.group
	$	dOlaR2
